Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 11. Audiologists and Speech-language Pathologists.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose related to the enactment of this chapter, see § 1, ch. 131, SLA 1986, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For audiologists, 12 AAC 07.

Sec. 08.11.010.
Qualifications for audiologist license.

The department shall issue a license to practice audiology to an individual who

is 18 years of age or older;

applies on a form provided by the department;

pays the fee required under AS

08.11.050

;

furnishes evidence satisfactory to the department that the person

has not engaged in conduct that is a ground for imposing disciplinary sanctions under AS

08.11.080

;

holds a master’s degree or doctorate in audiology from an accredited educational institution approved by the department; and either has

a Certificate of Clinical Competence in Audiology from the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or the equivalent of the certificate; or

practiced audiology for two years as of January 1, 1986, or is in the process of completing the year of supervised clinical experience required for the Certificate of Clinical Competence of the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For audiologists, see 12 AAC 7.

Sec. 08.11.015.
Qualifications for speech-language pathologist license.

The department shall issue a license to practice speech-language pathology to an individual who

is 18 years of age or older;

applies on a form provided by the department;

pays the fee required under AS

08.11.050

;

has not engaged in conduct that is a ground for imposing disciplinary sanctions under AS

08.11.085

; and

furnishes evidence satisfactory to the department that the person holds a Certificate of Clinical Competence in speech-language pathology from the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or the equivalent of the certificate.

History.

(§ 5 ch 42 SLA 2000)

Sec. 08.11.020.
Temporary license to practice audiology as an audiologist.

On receipt of the completed application the department shall issue a temporary license for the practice of audiology as an audiologist to an individual who is licensed to practice audiology in another state and has submitted to the department an application for a license under AS

08.11.010

.

The department may issue a temporary license to the following:

a nonresident for the practice of audiology as an audiologist in the state for 30 days or less in a calendar year, if the individual is licensed to practice audiology in another state, territory of the United States, foreign country, or province that has requirements for a license to practice audiology that are substantially equivalent to or higher than the requirements of AS

08.11.010

;

a nonresident for the practice of audiology as an audiologist in the state for 30 days or less in a calendar year, if the individual meets the qualifications and requirements for a license under AS

08.11.010

, and resides in a state or territory of the United States or a foreign country or province that does not license individuals to practice audiology.

The department may impose by regulation additional limitations that it determines appropriate on a temporary license issued under this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.11.025.
Temporary license to practice speech-language pathology as a speech-language pathologist.

The department may issue a temporary license for the practice of speech-language pathology as a speech-language pathologist to an individual who is licensed to practice speech-language pathology in another state and has submitted to the department an application for a license and appropriate fees under AS

08.11.015

.

Subject to (c) and (d) of this section, the department may issue a temporary license to the following:

a nonresident for the practice of speech-language pathology as a speech-language pathologist in the state for 60 days or less in a calendar year, if the individual is licensed to practice speech-language pathology in another state, territory of the United States, foreign country, or province that has requirements for a license to practice speech-language pathology that are substantially equivalent to or higher than the requirements of AS

08.11.015

;

a nonresident for the practice of speech-language pathology as a speech-language pathologist in the state for 60 days or less in a calendar year, if the individual meets the qualifications and requirements for a license under AS

08.11.015

and resides in a state or territory of the United States or a foreign country or province that does not license individuals to practice speech-language pathology;

a person, whether a resident or not, who is in the process of completing a year of supervised clinical experience required for a certificate of clinical competence in speech-language pathology from the American Speech-Language Hearing Association.

The department shall deny a temporary license to an applicant under (b) of this section if the board finds that the applicant has committed an act that is grounds for a disciplinary sanction under AS

08.11.085

.

The department may impose by regulation additional limitations that it determines appropriate on a temporary license issued under this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 114 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Sec. 08.11.030.
Reinstatement of lapsed license or registration; renewal of suspended license or registration.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

The department may reinstate a lapsed license or registration if the license or registration has lapsed for less than two years and if the individual submits to the department an application for renewal and pays a delinquency fee in addition to the renewal fee.

A suspended license or registration is subject to expiration and must be renewed as provided in AS

08.01.100

, but the renewal does not entitle the individual while the license or registration remains suspended to practice audiology, speech-language pathology, or as a speech-language pathologist assistant, or to engage in other activity or conduct that violates the order or judgment that suspended the license.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 7 ch 42 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 114 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, a reference to AS

08.01.100

was substituted for a reference to “this section” in (d) of this section to correct a manifest error of omission in ch. 94, SLA 1987.

Cross references. —

For license duration and renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

Sec. 08.11.040.
Display of license.

An individual licensed to practice audiology as an audiologist or licensed to practice speech-language pathology as a speech-language pathologist in the state shall display the license in a prominent place at each place of business of the individual.

If an audiologist or speech-language pathologist has more than one place of business, the department shall, on request and payment of a fee, issue a duplicate license for each place of business of the individual.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 42 SLA 2000)

Sec. 08.11.042.
Activities of speech-language pathologist assistant.

A person may not practice as a speech-language pathologist assistant in the state without registration under this chapter.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, a person registered under this chapter and who is under the immediate supervision of a person licensed as a speech-language pathologist in the state may perform treatment of a person who is medically fragile, as determined by the licensed speech-language pathologist, or who otherwise demonstrates a need for assistance with feeding or swallowing.

Except as provided in (b) and (e) of this section, a person registered under this chapter and who is under the direct supervision of a person licensed as a speech-language pathologist in the state may perform screening and treatment techniques or activities and assist the speech-language pathologist during assessments, research, in-service training, and public relations activities.

Except as provided in (b), (c), and (e) of this section, a person registered under this chapter and who is under the indirect supervision of a person licensed as a speech-language pathologist in the state may

perform screening and treatment activities, excluding interpretation, if the supervising speech-language pathologist has previously given instruction on the performance of those screening and treatment activities, has observed the assistant in the performance of those activities, and has determined that the speech-language pathologist assistant is competent to perform those activities;

conduct clerical tasks, including record keeping, documentation of a person’s progress toward meeting established objectives as stated in the treatment plan or individualized education plan, scheduling, and equipment maintenance;

implement a documented treatment plan, individualized education plan, or protocol developed by the supervising speech-language pathologist;

sign treatment notes if the note is reviewed and cosigned by the supervising speech-language pathologist; and

discuss with the client and the client’s family members or guardian behaviors observed by the speech-language pathologist assistant during treatment of the client when the behaviors are supported by documented objective data.

A registered speech-language pathologist assistant may not

administer diagnostic assessment tools, perform formal or informal evaluations, or interpret test or evaluation results;

participate in family conferences, on an interdisciplinary team, at a staff meeting, or at an individualized education plan meeting in which diagnostic information is interpreted or in which plans for a client’s treatment are developed or reviewed without the presence of a licensed speech-language pathologist;

write, develop, or modify a client’s treatment plan or individualized education plan;

assist a client without following a documented treatment plan or individualized education plan that has been prepared by a licensed and adequately trained speech-language pathologist;

sign a client record or billing record that does not contain the signature of a licensed speech-language pathologist;

select a person for speech-language pathology services;

provide counseling to a client or a client’s family or guardian;

disclose clinical or confidential information, either orally, in writing, or by electronic means, to anyone not designated in writing to receive the communication by a licensed speech-language pathologist; or

perform screening of feeding or swallowing functions.

History.

(§ 4 ch 114 SLA 2004)

Sec. 08.11.043.
Qualifications for speech-language pathologist assistant registration.

The department shall register an individual as a speech-language pathologist assistant if the individual submits an application on a form approved by the department, pays the required fee, and

submits proof satisfactory to the department that the individual has successfully completed

an associate of applied science degree in disabilities with a speech-language support emphasis either from the University of Alaska Anchorage in affiliation with Prince William Sound Community College or from another approved program; or

a bachelor’s degree in speech-language pathology from an accredited institution; and

submits proof satisfactory to the department that the individual has successfully completed 100 hours of field work supervised by a licensed speech-language pathologist.

Notwithstanding the requirements of (a) of this section, the department shall register an individual as a speech-language pathologist assistant if the individual provides proof satisfactory to the department that the individual has been employed in a position for at least one year preceding July 1, 2004, that includes the practice of speech-language pathologist assistant as set out in AS

08.11.042

and if the individual

submits an application on a form approved by the department;

pays the required fee;

submits proof satisfactory to the department that the individual has passed a competency-based checklist examination adopted by the department; and

submits a written recommendation from a licensed speech-language pathologist in support of the application.

The department shall maintain a registry of individuals registered under this section and shall notify an applicant in writing of a decision to approve or deny an application under this section. An approval is valid for two years, except as provided under AS

08.11.083

.

The department shall renew a valid registration issued under this chapter if the speech-language pathologist assistant submits a timely application on a form approved by the department accompanied by a sworn statement that the applicant has available documentation of approved continuing education consisting of 15 clock hours for the preceding two years. The department shall approve continuing education if the education is provided at state or regional conferences, workshops, formal in-service training, independent study programs, or a combination of these, and pertains to communication disorders.

History.

(§ 4 ch 114 SLA 2004)

Sec. 08.11.045.
Supervision of speech-language pathologist assistant.

A speech-language pathologist qualified under (b) of this section shall design and implement a plan for supervision of a speech-language pathologist assistant that protects the client and that maintains the highest possible standard of care. The amount of supervision required in the plan must be documented and must take into account the experience and skills of the speech-language pathologist assistant, the client’s needs, the service setting, the tasks assigned, and the laws governing the activities of the speech-language pathologist assistant. A plan for supervision must provide for direct supervision of the speech-language pathologist assistant for at least 50 percent of the speech-language pathologist assistant services during the first 90 days of employment of the speech-language pathologist assistant and, after the first 90 days of employment, for at least 20 percent of the speech-language pathologist assistant services.

A speech-language pathologist is qualified to supervise a speech-language pathologist assistant only if the speech-language pathologist is familiar with all applicable laws and

is licensed under this chapter; or

has a valid Type A or Type C teaching certificate issued under AS 14.20 with an endorsement in speech-language pathology, speech and hearing sciences, or communication disorders.

A speech-language pathologist qualified under (b) of this section who agrees to supervise a speech-language pathologist assistant shall

monitor and evaluate the services provided and documentation completed by the speech-language pathologist assistant, including the competency level for the type of client and service site and compliance with all applicable laws;

assist the speech-language pathologist assistant in the development of a professional development plan that includes at least 15 clock hours of approved continuing education under AS

08.11.043(d)

biennially; and

direct the handling of emergencies by the speech-language pathologist assistant.

A speech-language pathologist may not supervise more than two individuals or carry a higher caseload of clients while supervising a speech-language pathologist assistant than when the speech-language pathologist was not supervising a speech-language pathologist assistant.

History.

(§ 4 ch 114 SLA 2004)

Sec. 08.11.050.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for each of the following:

application;

credential review;

audiologist license and speech-language pathologist license;

temporary license;

renewal of license;

delinquency;

reinstatement;

duplicate license;

speech-language pathologist assistant registration application and renewal.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 114 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.11.070.
Dealing in hearing aids.

An audiologist may deal in hearing aids as a hearing aid dealer without being licensed as a hearing aid dealer under AS 08.55, but shall comply with AS

08.55.050

,

08.55.070

,

08.55.100

,

08.55.110(a)

,

08.55.110(b)(3)

and (c) — (h), and

08.55.130

(7) — (13) when dealing in hearing aids.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986)

Sec. 08.11.080.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions on an audiologist.

After a hearing, the department may impose a disciplinary sanction on an audiologist when the department finds that the licensee

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of practicing audiology;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the person’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

continued to practice audiology after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

use of drugs or alcohol in a manner that affects the person’s ability to practice audiology competently and safely;

physical or mental disability;

permitted another person to use the licensee’s license;

employed a person who does not have a valid current license to practice audiology to perform work as an audiologist covered by this chapter;

failed to comply with a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order of the department.

The department may not impose disciplinary sanctions on an audiologist for the evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment of a person through audio, video, or data communications when physically separated from the person if the audiologist

or another licensed health care provider is available to provide follow-up care;

requests that the person consent to sending a copy of all records of the encounter to a primary care provider if the audiologist is not the person’s primary care provider and, if the person consents, the audiologist sends the records to the person’s primary care provider; and

meets the requirements established by the department in regulation.

The department shall adopt regulations restricting the evaluation, diagnosis, supervision, and treatment of a person as authorized under (b) of this section by establishing standards of care, including standards for training, confidentiality, supervision, practice, and related issues.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 10 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (b) and (c).

Sec. 08.11.083.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions on a speech-language pathologist assistant.

After a hearing, the department may impose a disciplinary sanction on a registered speech-language pathologist assistant when the department finds that the registrant

secured a registration through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

fraudulently or deceptively used a registration;

altered a registration;

sold, bartered, or offered to sell or barter a registration;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of assisting in the practicing of speech-language pathology;

advertised speech-language services in a manner that is false, misleading, or deceptive;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the person’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely, including a crime involving drugs or alcohol;

engaged in unprofessional conduct, in sexual misconduct, or in lewd or immoral behavior in connection with the delivery of professional services to clients;

continued to practice speech-language pathology after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence or gross negligence;

use of drugs or alcohol in a manner that affects the person’s ability to practice speech-language pathology competently and safely;

a physical or mental disability;

permitted another person to use the registrant’s registration;

has been disciplined by an official government body with jurisdiction over licensure, certification, or registration of a health care or teaching practice; a certified copy of the final disciplinary action constitutes conclusive evidence against the person;

failed to maintain confidentiality except as otherwise required or permitted by law;

failed to comply with a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order of the department.

The department may not impose disciplinary sanctions on a speech- language pathologist assistant for the evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment of a person through audio, video, or data communications when physically separated from the person if the speech-language pathologist assistant

or another licensed health care provider is available to provide follow-up care;

requests that the person consent to sending a copy of all records of the encounter to a primary care provider if the speech-language pathologist assistant is not the person’s primary care provider and, if the person consents, the speech-language pathologist assistant sends the records to the person’s primary care provider; and

meets the requirements established by the board in regulation.

The department shall adopt regulations restricting the evaluation, diagnosis, supervision, and treatment of a person as authorized under (b) of this section by establishing standards of care, including standards for training, confidentiality, supervision, practice, and related issues.

History.

(§ 6 ch 114 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (b) and (c).

Sec. 08.11.085.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions on a speech-language pathologist.

After a hearing, the department may impose a disciplinary sanction on a speech-language pathologist when the department finds that the licensee

secured a license or temporary license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

fraudulently or deceptively used a license or temporary license;

altered a license or temporary license;

sold, bartered, or offered to sell or barter a license or temporary license;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of practicing speech-language pathology;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the person’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

engaged in unprofessional conduct, in sexual misconduct, or in lewd or immoral behavior in connection with the delivery of professional services to clients;

continued to practice speech-language pathology after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

use of drugs or alcohol in a manner that affects the person’s ability to practice speech-language pathology competently and safely;

a physical or mental disability;

permitted another person to use the licensee’s license or temporary license;

employed a person who does not have a valid current license or temporary license to practice speech-language pathology to perform work as a speech-language pathologist covered by this chapter;

failed to comply with a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order of the department.

The department may not impose disciplinary sanctions on a speech- language pathologist for the evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment of a person through audio, video, or data communications when physically separated from the person if the speech-language pathologist

or another licensed health care provider is available to provide follow-up care;

requests that the person consent to sending a copy of all records of the encounter to a primary care provider if the speech-language pathologist is not the person’s primary care provider and, if the person consents, the speech-language pathologist sends the records to the person’s primary care provider; and

meets the requirements established by the board in regulation.

The department shall adopt regulations restricting the evaluation, diagnosis, supervision, and treatment of a person as authorized under (b) of this section by establishing standards of care, including standards for training, confidentiality, supervision, practice, and related issues.

History.

(§ 11 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (b) and (c).

Sec. 08.11.090.
Disciplinary sanctions.

When it finds that an audiologist has committed an act listed in AS

08.11.080

, that a speech-language pathologist has committed an act listed in AS

08.11.085

, or that a speech-language pathologist assistant has committed an act listed in AS

08.11.083

, the department may impose the following sanctions singly or in combination:

permanently revoke a license or registration to practice;

suspend a license or registration for a determinate period of time;

censure a licensee or registrant;

issue a letter of reprimand;

place a licensee or registrant on probationary status and require the licensee or registrant to

report regularly to the department on matters involving the basis of probation;

limit practice to those areas prescribed;

continue professional education until a satisfactory degree of skill has been attained in those areas determined by the department to need improvement;

impose limitations or conditions on the practice of a licensee or registrant.

The department may withdraw a limitation, condition, or probationary status if it finds that the deficiency that required the sanction has been remedied.

The department may summarily suspend a license before final hearing or during the appeals process if the department finds that the licensee poses a clear and immediate danger to the public welfare and safety if the licensee continues to practice. An individual whose license is suspended under this subsection is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) not later than seven days after the effective date of the order. The individual may appeal the suspension after the hearing to the superior court.

The department may reinstate a license or registration that has been suspended or revoked if the department finds after a hearing that the individual is able to practice with reasonable skill and safety.

One year after revocation of a license or registration issued under this chapter, the individual whose license or registration was revoked may reapply for the license or registration. The department may require an examination for reinstatement.

The department may place a registrant on probation, with the costs of probation to be borne by the registrant

in lieu of revocation or suspension;

upon the issuance of a registration to an individual who has been found guilty of unprofessional conduct but who otherwise qualifies for registration under this chapter; or

as a condition upon the reissuance or reinstatement of any registration that has been suspended or revoked by the department.

The department may require a registrant who has been placed on probation or who has been suspended to obtain additional professional training, including continuing education or clinical or field work.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 12 ch 42 SLA 2000; am §§ 7 — 11 ch 114 SLA 2004; am § 9 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For general disciplinary powers, see AS

08.01.075

.

Sec. 08.11.095.
Revocation of speech-language pathologist license.

After a hearing, the department shall revoke the speech-language pathologist license of a person who does not continue to be able to furnish the evidence required for licensure under AS

08.11.015

(5).

History.

(§ 13 ch 42 SLA 2000)

Sec. 08.11.100.
Prohibited acts.

Unless a person is licensed as an audiologist under this chapter, the person may not

practice audiology;

use a title indicating or representing that the person practices as an audiologist;

advertise that the person practices audiology.

Unless a person is licensed as a speech-language pathologist under this chapter, the person may not

practice speech-language pathology;

use a title indicating or representing that the person practices as a speech-language pathologist;

advertise that the person practices speech-language pathology.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986; am §§ 14, 15 ch 42 SLA 2000)

Sec. 08.11.110.
Penalty.

A person who violates AS

08.11.100

is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 08.11.120.
Audiology exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to an individual who practices audiology consistent with the accepted standards and code of ethics of the individual’s profession as part of the individual’s duties as

a physician licensed under AS 08.64;

an employee of the federal government who is required to practice audiology during the employment, if

the employer maintains appropriate supervision of the individual’s practice of audiology;

the individual practices audiology as part of the duties for which the individual is employed;

the individual practices audiology in the facility where the individual is employed or under the supervision of the federal governmental unit where the individual is employed; and

the individual does not render or offer to render audiology services to the public for compensation in addition to the salary the individual receives from the federal governmental unit;

a student, intern, or resident pursuing a course of study in audiology at an accredited college or a clinical training facility approved by the department, if the activities of the student, intern, or resident constitute part of a supervised course of study and the student, intern, or resident is designated as an “audiology intern,” “audiology trainee,” or other title approved by the department that clearly indicates that the person is training to be an audiologist.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter,

a nurse licensed under AS 08.68 may perform hearing sensitivity evaluations;

an individual licensed as a hearing aid dealer under AS 08.55 may deal in hearing aids;

an individual holding a class A certificate issued by the Conference of Executives of American Schools of the Deaf may teach the hearing impaired;

an individual may engage in the testing of hearing as part of a hearing conservation program that complies with the regulations of the Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the federal government if the individual is certified to do the testing by a state or federal agency acceptable to the Occupational Safety and Health Administration;

an individual may perform hearing screening under AS

47.20.310

if authorized to do so under a protocol adopted under AS

47.20.310(e)

by the Department of Health and Social Services.

An individual who is not an audiologist, but who is exempt under this section, may not use a title or description stating or implying that the person is an audiologist.

An individual exempt under (a)(2) of this section may consult with and disseminate research findings and scientific information to accredited academic institutions or governmental agencies, and offer lectures to the public for a fee, monetary or otherwise, without being licensed under this chapter.

An individual who is not licensed under this chapter but who teaches the practice of audiology in an audiologist training program at a college or university may use the title “audiologist” but may not practice audiology.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 43 SLA 2006)

Sec. 08.11.125.
Speech-language pathology exemptions.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, this chapter does not apply to an individual who practices speech-language pathology as part of the individual’s duties as

a physician licensed under AS 08.64;

an employee of, or contractor with, a school district while practicing speech-language pathology for the school district;

a student, intern, or resident pursuing a course of study in speech-language pathology at an accredited college or a clinical training facility approved by the department if the activities of the student, intern, or resident constitute part of a supervised course of study and the student, intern, or resident is designated as a “speech-language pathology intern,” “speech-language pathology trainee,” or other title approved by the department that clearly indicates that the person is training to be a speech-language pathologist.

An individual who is not licensed as a speech-language pathologist but who is exempt under (a)(1) or (3) of this section may not use a title or description stating or implying that the person is a speech-language pathologist.

An individual who is not licensed under this chapter but who teaches the practice of speech-language pathology in a speech-language pathology training program at a college or university may use the title “speech-language pathologist” but may not practice speech-language pathology.

History.

(§ 16 ch 42 SLA 2000)

Sec. 08.11.130.
Administrative Procedure Act.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations and proceedings under this chapter.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986)

Sec. 08.11.200.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,

“audiologist” means an individual who is licensed under AS

08.11.010

to practice audiology in the state;

“dealing in hearing aids” has the meaning given in AS

08.55.200

;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“direct supervision” means supervision that is on-site or available by visual or real-time electronic means through which a supervising speech-language pathologist observes and guides a speech-language pathologist assistant while the assistant performs a clinical activity; “direct supervision” may include demonstration, coaching, and observation to the extent that the demonstration, coaching, or observation otherwise meets the requirements of this paragraph;

“hearing aid” has the meaning given in AS

08.55.200

;

“immediate supervision” means supervision in the physical presence of the speech-language pathologist assistant during the provision of client services by the speech-language pathologist assistant;

“indirect supervision” means supervision by telephonic or electronic means or by intermittent on-site visits while located either inside or outside of the facility in which the speech-language pathologist assistant is located; “indirect supervision” may include demonstrations, record review, evaluation of audiotaped or videotaped client services, or communication by telephone or electronic mail to the extent that these activities otherwise meet the requirements of this paragraph;

“practice of audiology” means the application of principles, methods, and procedures of measurement, testing, appraisal, prediction, consultation, habilitation, rehabilitation, counseling, and instruction related to hearing and hearing impairment for the purpose of modifying communicative disorders involving speech, language, auditory function, including auditory training, speech reading and the recommendation, evaluation, fitting, and sale of hearing aids, including the fitting of ear molds;

“practice of speech-language pathology” means the application of principles, methods, and procedures related to the development and disorders of human communication, including

screening for, identifying, assessing, interpreting, diagnosing, rehabilitating, and preventing disorders of speech, such as disorders related to articulation, fluency, voice, and language;

screening for, identifying, assessing, interpreting, diagnosing, and rehabilitating disorders of oral-pharyngeal function or dysphagia or related disorders;

screening for, identifying, assessing, interpreting, diagnosing, and rehabilitating cognitive and communication disorders;

assessing, selecting, and developing augmentative and alternative communication systems and providing training in their use;

providing aural rehabilitation and related counseling services to hearing impaired individuals and their families;

enhancing speech-language proficiency and communication effectiveness, such as accent reduction; and

screening of hearing and other factors for the purpose of speech-language evaluation or the initial identification of individuals with other communication disorders, if judgments and descriptive statements about the results of the screening are limited to pass-fail determinations;

“screening” means a procedure in which a client is identified by either “pass” or “fail” for purposes of necessitating further evaluation of speech, language, or hearing;

“speech-language pathologist” means an individual who is licensed under AS

08.11.015

to practice speech-language pathology in the state;

“supervision” means the provision of direction and evaluation of the tasks assigned.

History.

(§ 7 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 17 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 12 ch 114 SLA 2004; am § 19 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

This section was reorganized in 2004 to maintain alphabetical order.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in paragraph (3), in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (9), deleted “but not limited to” at the end of the introductory language, inserted “for” following “screening” three times, inserted “disorders related to” following “such as” in (9)(A), and made stylistic changes.